Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 22 Regulation of Boats

46-22-1.
Declaration of policy.

It is the policy of this state to promote safety for person and property in and connected with the use, operation, and equipment of vessels, and to promote uniformity of laws relating thereto.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 187, § 1.

46-22-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires a different meaning:

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental management.

“Motorboat” means any vessel whether or not the vessel is propelled by machinery. For purposes of this chapter, motorboat shall not include houseboats as defined in §

44-5-25.1

, canoes, and rowboats twelve feet (12´) in length or less.

“Operate” means to navigate or otherwise use a motorboat or a vessel.

“Owner” means a person, other than a lien holder, having the property in or title to a motorboat. The term includes a person entitled to the use or possession of a motorboat subject to an interest in another person, reserved, or created by agreement and securing payment or performance of an obligation, but the term excludes a lessee under a lease not intended as security.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, firm, corporation, association, or other entity.

“Personal watercraft” means a small class A vessel less than sixteen feet (16´) in length which uses an outboard motor or an inboard motor powering a water jet pump as its primary source of motive power; and which is designed to be operated by a person sitting, standing, or kneeling on, or being towed behind the vessel, rather than the conventional manner of sitting or standing inside of the vessel.

“Vessel” means every description of watercraft, other than a seaplane on the water, used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water.

“Waters of this state” means any waters within the territorial limits of this state, and the marginal sea adjacent to this state and the high seas when navigated as a part of a journey or ride to or from the shore of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 24, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 178, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 384, § 1.

46-22-3.
Operation of unnumbered motorboats prohibited.

Every motorboat on the waters of this state shall be numbered.

No person shall operate or give permission for the operation of any motorboat on those waters unless the motorboat is numbered in accordance with this chapter, or in accordance with applicable federal law, or in accordance with a federally approved numbering system of another state, and unless:

The certificate of number awarded to the motorboat is in full force and effect, and

The identifying number set forth in the certificate of number is displayed on each side of the bow of the motorboat.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 56.

46-22-4.
Identification number and registration fee.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), the owner of each motorboat shall file biennially an application for registration with the department of environmental management on forms approved by the director. The application shall be accompanied by a registration fee according to the following schedule:

For the purpose of the above fee schedule, “overall length” shall be defined as the horizontal distance between the foremost part of the stem, and, the aftermost part of the stern, excluding bowsprits, bumpkins, rudders, outboard motor brackets, and similar fittings or attachments. For purposes of this section, a fraction of a foot shall be deemed to be the next higher foot.

The fee payable under this section for any motorboat owned by a nonprofit organization shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50.00).

All vessels over thirty feet (30´) may, upon request, pay the registration fee annually at the rate of one-half (1/2) the biennial fee for a vessel of the same length.

Upon receipt of the completed application and correct registration fee, the department of environmental management shall enter the application and registration fee into its records, and issue to the owner a certificate of number stating the number awarded to the motorboat and the name and address of the owner. The owner shall paint on or attach to each side of the bow of the motorboat the identification number in such manner as may be prescribed by rules and regulations of the department of environmental management in order that it may be clearly visible. The number shall be maintained in legible condition. The certificate of number shall be pocket size and shall be available at all times for inspection on the motorboat for which issued, whenever that motorboat is in operation.

The owner of any motorboat already covered by an identification number, in full force and effect, which has been awarded to it pursuant to then operative federal law or a federally approved numbering system of another state, shall record the number with the department of environmental management prior to operating the motorboat on the waters of this state in excess of the ninety (90) day reciprocity period provided for in § 46-22-6(a). The recordation shall be in the manner and subject to the procedure and fees required for the award and transfer of a number under subsections (a) and (c) through (i), except that no additional or substitute number shall be issued.

Should the ownership of a motorboat change, a new application form shall be filed with the department of environmental management. Should the change in ownership take place before the date upon which the certificate of number expires, the new owner shall pay an administrative fee of ten dollars ($10.00). The number assigned to the vessel shall remain with the vessel and be non-transferable while the vessel remains certified in the state of Rhode Island; provided, however, that upon the request of the owner of a duly registered vessel of historic value that is more than fifty (50) years old, the number assigned to the vessel may be transferred to a different historic vessel owned by the same person. The original vessel will be given a new registration number and the owner shall pay a transfer fee of six dollars ($6.00) for each vessel.

In the event that an agency of the United States government shall have in force an overall system of identification numbering for motorboats within the United States, the numbering system employed pursuant to this chapter by the department of environmental management shall be in conformity therewith.

All records of the department of environmental management made or kept pursuant to this section shall be public records.

The department of environmental management shall fix a day and month of the year on which the certificate of number is due to expire and no longer be of any force and effect, unless renewed pursuant to this chapter.

The owner shall furnish the department of environmental management notice of the transfer of all or any part of the owner’s interest, other than the creation of a security interest in a motorboat numbered in this state, pursuant to subsections (a) and (b), or of the destruction or abandonment of the motorboat, within fifteen (15) days thereof. That destruction shall terminate the certificate of number for the motorboat.

Any holder of a certificate of number shall notify the department of environmental management within fifteen (15) days if the holder’s address no longer conforms to the address appearing on the certificate and shall, as a part of the notification, furnish the department of environmental management the new address. The department of environmental management may provide, in its rules and regulations, for the surrender of the certificate bearing the former address or for the alteration of an outstanding certificate to show the new address of the holder.

No number, other than the number awarded to a motorboat or granted reciprocity pursuant to this chapter, shall be painted, attached, or otherwise displayed on either side of the bow of the motorboat.

Biennial registration shall be phased in, alphabetically, over a two (2) year period starting January 1, 1999 at which time all owners whose last names begin with the letters “A” through “M” applications for registration will be accepted for consideration on a biennial basis. Owners whose last names begin with the letters “N” through “Z” shall be subject to biennial registration starting January 1, 2000.

OVERALL LENGTH NOT MORE BIENNIAL FEE AT LEAST THAN FEET FEET UNDER 15 $30 16 20 $40 21 25 $60 26 30 $100 31 35 $200 36 40 $250 41 45 $300 46 50 $400 51 and over $600

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 184, §§ 1 to 3; P.L. 1969, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 317, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 406, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 24, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 185, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 268, § 1.

46-22-5.
Classification and required equipment.

Motorboats subject to the provisions of this chapter shall be divided into four (4) classes as follows:

Class A. Less than sixteen feet (16´) in length.

Class 1. Sixteen feet (16´) or over and less than twenty-six feet (26´) in length.

Class 2. Twenty-six feet (26´) or over and less than forty feet (40´) in length.

Class 3. Forty feet (40´) or over and not more than sixty-five feet (65´) in length.

Every motorboat, in all weathers, from sunset to sunrise, shall carry and exhibit the following lights when under way, and during that time no other lights which may be mistaken for those prescribed shall be exhibited.

Every motorboat of Classes A and 1 shall carry the following lights:

A bright white light aft to show all around the horizon.

A combined lantern in the fore part of the vessel and lower than the white light aft, showing green to starboard and red to port, so fixed as to throw the light from right ahead to two (2) points abaft the beam of their respective sides.

Every motorboat of Classes 2 and 3 shall carry the following lights:

A bright white light in the fore part of the vessel, as near the stem as practicable, so constructed as to show an unbroken light over an arc of the horizon of twenty (20) points of the compass, so fixed as to throw the light ten (10) points on each side of the vessel; namely, from right ahead to two (2) points abaft the beam on either side.

A bright white light aft to show all around the horizon and higher than the white light forward.

On the starboard side, a green light so constructed as to show an unbroken light over an arc of the horizon of ten (10) points of the compass, so fixed as to throw the light from right ahead to two (2) points abaft the beam on the starboard side. On the port side, a red light so constructed as to show an unbroken light over an arc of the horizon of ten (10) points of the compass, so fixed as to throw the light from right ahead to two (2) points abaft the beam on the port side. The side lights shall be fitted with inboard screens of sufficient height so set as to prevent these lights from being seen across the bow.

Motorboats of Classes A and 1, when propelled by sail alone, shall carry the combined lantern, but not the white light aft, prescribed by this section. Motorboats of Classes 2 and 3, when so propelled, shall carry the colored side lights, suitably screened, but not the white lights, prescribed by this section. Motorboats of all classes, when so propelled, shall carry, ready at hand, a lantern or flashlight showing a white light which shall be exhibited in sufficient time to avert collision.

Every white light prescribed by this section shall be of such character as to be visible at a distance of at least two (2) miles. Every colored light prescribed by this section shall be of such character as to be visible at a distance of at least one mile. The word “visible” in this subsection, when applied to lights, shall mean visible on a dark night with clear atmosphere.

When propelled by sail and machinery, any motorboat shall carry the lights required by this section for a motorboat propelled by machinery only.

Any vessel may carry and exhibit the lights required by the federal regulations for preventing collisions at sea, 33 U.S.C. § 2000 et seq., in lieu of the lights required by subsection (b).

Every motorboat of Class 1, 2, or 3 shall be provided with an efficient whistle or other sound producing mechanical appliance.

Every vessel shall carry at least one life preserver, or life belt, or ring buoy, or other device of the sort prescribed by the regulations of the department of environmental management, for each person on board, so placed as to be readily accessible; provided, that every motorboat carrying passengers for hire shall carry, so placed as to be readily accessible, at least one life preserver of the sort prescribed by the regulations of the department of environmental management, for each person on board.

Every motorboat shall be provided with such number, size, and type of fire extinguishers, capable of promptly and effectually extinguishing burning gasoline, as may be prescribed by the regulations of the department of environmental management, which fire extinguishers shall be at all times kept in condition for immediate and effective use and shall be so placed as to be readily accessible.

The provisions of subsections (d), and (f) shall not apply to motorboats while competing in any race conducted pursuant to §

46-22-13

or, if the boats be designed and intended solely for racing, while engaged in such navigation as is incidental to the tuning up of the boats and engines for the race.

Every motorboat shall have the carburetor or carburetors of every engine therein (except outboard motors) using gasoline as fuel, equipped with such efficient flame arrestor, backfire trap, or other similar device as may be prescribed by the regulations of the department of environmental management.

Every motorboat and every vessel, except open boats, using as fuel any liquid of a volatile nature, shall be provided with such means as may be prescribed by the regulations of the department of environmental management, for properly and efficiently ventilating the bilges of the engine and fuel tank compartments so as to remove any explosive or inflammable gases.

The department of environmental management is hereby authorized to make rules and regulations modifying the equipment requirements contained in this section to the extent necessary to keep these requirements in conformity with the provisions of the federal Boat Safety Act of 1971 as amended or the federal navigation laws or with the navigation rules promulgated by the United States Coast Guard.

The department of environmental management is hereby authorized to establish and maintain, for the operation of vessels not more than sixty-five feet (65´) in length on the waters of this state, pilot rules in conformity with the pilot rules contained in the federal navigation laws or the navigation rules promulgated by the United States Coast Guard.

No person shall operate or give permission for the operation of a vessel, which is not equipped as required by this section, or modification thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 134, § 2; P.L. 1965, ch. 134, § 3; P.L. 1991, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 331, § 1.

46-22-6.
Exemption from numbering provisions of this chapter.

A motorboat shall not be required to be numbered under this chapter if it is:

Already covered by a number in full force and effect which has been awarded to it pursuant to federal law or federally approved numbering system of another state; provided, however, in the event the boat is to be operated on the waters of this state in excess of ninety (90) days, the owner shall record the number with the department of environmental management, division of boating safety, and pay the fees required under this chapter.

A motorboat from a country other than the United States temporarily using the waters of this state.

A motorboat whose owner is the United States, a state, or a subdivision thereof.

A ship’s lifeboat.

A motorboat used exclusively for racing.

A houseboat as defined in §

44-5-25.1

.

A rowboat twelve feet (12´) in length or less.

A canoe.

A ferry.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 24, § 2.

46-22-7.
Boat liveries.

The owner of a boat livery shall cause to be kept a record of the name and address of the person or persons hiring any vessel which is designed or permitted by him or her to be operated as a motorboat; the identification number thereof; and the departure date and time, and the expected time of return. The record shall be preserved for at least six (6) months.

Neither the owner of a boat livery nor his or her agent or employee shall permit any motorboat or any vessel designed or permitted by him or her to be operated as a motorboat to depart from his or her premises unless it shall have been provided, either by owner or renter, with the equipment required pursuant to §

46-22-5

, and any rules and regulations made pursuant thereto.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 187, § 1.

46-22-8.
Muffling devices.

The exhaust of every internal combustion engine used on any motorboat shall be effectively muffled by equipment so constructed and used as to muffle the noise of the exhaust in a reasonable manner. Outboard motors shall be equipped with underwater exhausts of standard manufacture as furnished by marine supply dealers. The use of cutouts is prohibited, except for motorboats competing in a regatta or boat race approved as provided in §

46-22-13

, and for such motorboats while on trial-runs approved as provided in §

46-22-13(b)

, or during a period not to exceed forty-eight (48) hours immediately preceding the regatta or race and for the motorboats, while competing in official trials for speed records, during a period not to exceed forty-eight (48) hours immediately following the regatta or race.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 187, § 1.

46-22-9.
Prohibited operation.

No person shall operate any motorboat or vessel, or manipulate any water skis, surfboard, or similar device in a reckless manner so as to endanger the life, limb, or property of another.

No person shall operate any motorboat or vessel or manipulate any water skis, surfboard, or similar device while intoxicated or under the influence of any narcotic drug, barbiturate, or marijuana. A person arrested and charged with operating any motorboat or vessel, or manipulating any water skis, surfboard, or similar device, while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotic or habit-forming drugs, shall have the right to be examined at his or her own expense immediately after his or her arrest, by a physician selected by him or her, and the officer so arresting or so charging that person shall immediately inform that person of this right and afford him or her a reasonable opportunity to exercise this right, and at the trial of that person the prosecution must prove that he or she was so informed and was afforded the opportunity.

No person shall operate a motorboat or vessel within a water area, which has been clearly marked, in accordance with, and as authorized by, the laws of the state, by buoys or some other distinguishing device as a bathing, swimming, or otherwise restricted area; provided, that this section shall not apply in the case of an emergency, or to patrol or rescue craft. The department of environmental management, is hereby authorized to establish maximum speeds for boats in the public harbors in the state of Rhode Island at five (5) miles per hour, no wake. Any such speed limits duly established by the department of environmental management, pursuant hereto, shall have the full force and effect of law, and a violation thereof shall be a misdemeanor in accordance with the penalties enumerated in §

46-22-19(3)

.

No person shall operate any motorboat, vessel, or seaplane in a manner which shall unreasonably or unnecessarily interfere with any other motorboat, vessel, or seaplane, or with the free and proper navigation of the waterways of the state. Anchoring under bridges or in heavily traveled channels shall constitute interference if unreasonable under the prevailing circumstances.

No motorboat, vessel, or seaplane shall be docked or made fast to any pier, wharf, or other shore structure without the consent of the owner thereof, except in the case of an emergency.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 62, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 86, § 1.

46-22-9.1.
Houseboats — Exclusion from coastal ponds.

No person shall live on a houseboat on any coastal pond in this state.

As used in this section, “houseboat,” means a building constructed on a float, raft, or barge that is used for single or multiple family habitation or is represented as a place of business. If used as a means of transportation, this use is secondary. “Houseboat” includes platforms, and waterborne hotels and restaurants.

A “coastal pond”, as used in this section, shall be as designated or defined in the rules and regulations of the coastal resources management council.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 369, § 1.

46-22-9.2.
Flotation devices — Children.

Any person transporting a child under thirteen (13) years of age in a recreational vessel less than sixty-five (65) feet in length on the waters of this state shall require that the child wear a personal flotation device approved by the United States Coast Guard when underway, unless below deck or in a closed cabin.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 47, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 362, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 329, § 1.

46-22-9.3.
Operating so as to endanger, resulting in death.

When the death of any person ensues as a proximate result of an injury received by the operation of any vessel in reckless disregard of the safety of others, the person so operating such vessel shall be guilty of “operating so as to endanger, resulting in death.”

Any person charged with the commission of the foregoing shall upon conviction be imprisoned for not more than ten (10) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 121, § 1.

46-22-9.4.
Operating so as to endanger, resulting in personal injury.

When the serious bodily injury of any person ensues as a proximate result of the operation of any vessel in reckless disregard of the safety of others, the person so operating such vessel shall be guilty of “operating so as to endanger, resulting in personal injury.”

“Serious bodily injury” means physical injury that creates a substantial risk of death or causes serious permanent disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ.

Any person charged with a violation of this section shall upon conviction be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years and shall be required to take a boating safety course.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 121, § 1.

46-22-9.5.
Speeding.

No person shall operate any motor-boat or vessel in any harbor or inlet or any pond or other confined body of water in this state in excess of forty-five (45) miles per hour during the hours from sunrise to sunset and twenty-five (25) miles per hour during periods of darkness or other periods of restricted visibility; provided, however, nothing herein shall prohibit the posting of lesser speed limits where deemed necessary by the appropriate state or local authority.

Violations of this section shall be as follows:

The first violation, if no greater than ten (10) miles per hour over the speed limit, shall be a civil offense which shall require payment of a twenty-five dollar ($25.00) assessment fee and the violator may be required to attend a boating safety course.

Any violation in excess of ten (10) miles per hour over the speed limit shall be deemed a misdemeanor with fines as follows:

11-15 miles per hour in excess of speed limit $50.00 (ii) 16-20 miles per hour in excess of speed limit $75.00 (iii) 21-25 miles per hour in excess of speed limit $100.00 (iv) Greater than 25 miles per hour in excess of speed limit: Fine of five dollars ($5.00) per mile in excess of speed limit. (v) The violator shall also be required to attend a boating safety course.

State, federal, and local law enforcement and rescue agencies may exceed this speed limit when responding to an emergency or law enforcement action: provided that this speed does not endanger any person not involved in this action.

The operation of personal watercrafts, as defined, use, speed, age of operator, and area of operation shall be regulated by the department of environmental management. Rules and regulations shall be promulgated by the department within three (3) months of June 16, 1991.

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 56.

46-22-9.6.
False distress or hoax calls.

Whoever, knowing it to be false, transmits or causes to be transmitted by radio, telephone, use of emergency flares or other means of communication, the alleged occurrence or impending occurrence of an emergency situation which threatens the life, or safety of a person and/or the loss of property, to any state, federal or local law enforcement or other public safety agency shall be guilty of transmitting a false distress or hoax call.

Any person charged with the commission of the foregoing shall, upon conviction, be subject to imprisonment not to exceed one year and a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000). In addition to any other fines or penalties imposed under this section, the person or persons convicted shall pay restitution for any cost related to the emergency response to the false or hoax call.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 32, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 33, § 1.

46-22-9.7.
Marine safety zones.

The director shall formulate a memorandum of understanding with the coastal resources management council and the United States Coast Guard with regard to the establishment of temporary safety zones and/or exclusionary zones.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 32, § 1.

46-22-9.8.
Certificate of boating safety education.

No person born on or after January 1, 1986 shall operate a vessel that is fitted with propulsion machinery of more than ten (10) horsepower on the waters of this state unless the person shall have successfully completed a boating safety education program as approved by the director of the department of environmental management.

The content of acceptable boating safety education programs shall meet the minimum standards and guidelines and be approved by the National Association of State Boating Law Administrators (NASBLA). Acceptable programs shall include those NASBLA approved courses offered by the state, the United States Coast Guard Auxiliary, the United States Power Squadrons or any other course approved by the director.

Instructors shall meet the minimum requirements as established by NASBLA and shall be certified by the state.

Upon completion of a boating safety course, a written test shall be administered under the direct supervision of a certified instructor. The test shall include at least twenty-five (25) questions, scored on a one hundred percent (100%) scale, and have a passing grade of seventy percent (70%) or better. Test results shall be maintained by the department of environmental management, division of enforcement.

The department shall issue a durable certificate of completion that meets the NASBLA guidelines. The certificate of completion shall be presented upon request of any authorized law enforcement officer to show proof of compliance.

A challenge exam, meeting the standards of subsection (d) proctored and administered by a certified instructor, shall be made available to those individuals that wish to review the requirements of this section. The exam may be administered to a candidate two (2) times. Failure of the examination on the second attempt will require the candidate to retake and/or complete the same and/or a different boating safety education program as provided for in this section.

Any person having in his or her possession a certificate of completion of any boating safety course approved by NASBLA shall be considered to be in compliance with this chapter and can request that a certificate be issued by the department.

The following persons shall be exempt from the educational provisions of this chapter provided that they can provide proof of exemption:

A person who operates a vessel under training, directly supervised by a person on board the vessel who is eighteen (18) years of age or older and meets the requirements of subsection (a);

A person who holds a valid commercial vessel operator’s license issued by the United States Cost Guard, a state, or a province;

Non-residents temporarily using the waters of this state who meet the requirements of their state of legal residence.

New residents of this state will be given sixty (60) days to meet the requirements of this chapter.

Boat liveries that rent out boats or vessels fitted with propulsion machinery greater than ten (10) horse power shall require all renters who do not comply with this section to watch a short instructional video approved by the director on boating safety for the type of craft rented, and pass a written examination.

Any person operating a personal watercraft as defined in §

46-22-2(6)

on the waters of this state shall have successfully completed a boating safety education program as approved by the director of the department of environmental management.

Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be sanctioned as follows:

For a first offense completion of an approved boating safety course;

For a second offense a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 62, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 211, § 1.

46-22-10.
Collisions, accidents, and casualties.

It shall be the duty of the operator of any motorboat or vessel involved in a collision, accident, or other casualty, so far as he or she can do so without serious danger to his or her own vessel, crew, and passengers (if any), to render to other persons affected by the collision, accident, or other casualty, such assistance as may be practicable and as may be necessary in order to save them from or minimize any danger caused by the collision, accident, or other casualty, and also to give his or her name, address, and identification of his or her vessel in writing to any person injured and to the owner of any property damaged in the collision, accident, or other casualty.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 267, § 1.

46-22-11.
Transmittal of information.

In accordance with any request duly made by an authorized official or agency of the United States, any information compiled or otherwise available to the department of environmental management, pursuant to §

46-22-21

or

46-22-22

, shall be transmitted to that official or agency of the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 134, § 4.

46-22-12.
Water skis and surfboards.

No person shall operate a vessel on any waters of this state for towing a person or persons on water skis, or a surfboard, or similar device unless there is in the vessel a person at least twelve (12) years of age, in addition to the operator, in a position to observe the progress of the person or persons being towed. Any person or persons on water skis, a surfboard, a tube or similar device that is being towed behind a vessel on any waters of this state shall be required to wear a life jacket approved by the U.S. Coast Guard.

No person shall operate a vessel on any waters of this state towing a person or persons on water skis, a surfboard, or similar device, nor shall any person engage in water skiing, surfboarding, or similar activity at any time between the hours from one hour after sunset to one hour before sunrise.

The provisions of subsections (a) and (b) do not apply to a performer engaged in a professional exhibition or a person or persons engaged in an activity authorized under §

46-22-13

.

No person shall operate or manipulate any vessel, tow rope, or other device by which the direction or location of water skis, a surfboard, or similar device may be affected or controlled in such a way as to cause the water skis, surfboard, or similar device, or any person thereon to collide with or strike against any object or person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 87, § 1.

46-22-13.
Regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, or exhibitions.

No regatta, motorboat or other boat race, marine parade, tournament, or exhibition (but not including a navigational or piloting contest), in which vessels participating are to be propelled by machinery, may be held on any waters of this state unless authorized by the department of environmental management, as set forth in this section. The department shall adopt and may, from time to time, amend regulations concerning the safety of motorboats and other vessels and persons thereon, either observers or participants.

Whenever a regatta, motorboat or other boat race, marine parade, tournament, or exhibition is proposed to be held, the person in charge thereof, shall, at least fifteen (15) days prior thereto, file an application with the department of environmental management for permission to hold the regatta, motorboat or other boat race, marine parade, tournament, or exhibition. The application shall set forth the date, time, and location where it is proposed to hold the regatta, motorboat or other boat race, marine parade, tournament, or exhibition, and it shall not be conducted without authorization of the department of environmental management in writing.

No application for a motorboat race (not including a navigational or a piloting contest), in which vessels participating are to be propelled by machinery on any waters of this state, shall be approved by the department of environmental management until the applicant shall furnish proof to the department that the applicant has in force regatta liability insurance in the following amounts:

Bodily injury to one person $10,000 (ii) Bodily injury to two or more persons $20,000 (iii) Property damage – one accident $5,000 (iv) Property damage – aggregate $10,000

A special permit shall be obtained from the department of environmental management for authorization to engage in a trial run (other than a trial run held under the provisions of§

46-22-8

) for a motorboat regatta or race, with or without cutouts and/or mufflers, the permit setting forth the time, place, and other conditions under which the trial run may be made.

Motorboats used exclusively for racing, operating on the waters of this state, other than when competing in a duly authorized regatta or race, or making trial runs as set forth in this chapter, shall comply with all the provisions of this chapter.

The provisions of this section shall not exempt any person from compliance with applicable federal law or regulation, but nothing contained herein shall be construed to require the securing of a state permit pursuant to this section if a permit therefor has been obtained from an authorized agency of the United States.

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 134, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 56.

46-22-13.1.
Marine safety zones.

The director of the department of environmental management is hereby authorized, when necessary for the safety of the public and/or protection of the environment, to establish temporary safety zones on the waters of this state for the purposes of restricting vessel traffic, and direct those persons authorized to enforce the provisions of this chapter to prosecute in district court any violations of any marine safety zone. The director shall coordinate with the U.S. Coast Guard and, when applicable, local harbormasters prior to the establishment of a marine safety zone.

As described in this section, a temporary marine safety zone shall not exist for longer than seventy-two (72) consecutive hours. Only in the event of an environmental disaster, marine disaster or public safety emergency shall the director have the authority to extend the zone beyond seventy-two (72) hours.

Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to imprisonment not to exceed one year or a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1000), or both, for each violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 421, § 1.

46-22-13.2.
Bridge safety.

All ships whose primary cargo is liquefied natural gas as defined in U.S.C. title 49, § 60101(11) shall have at least thirty feet (30´) of clearance under all of Rhode Island’s bridges. This section shall not apply to boats under sail.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 133, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 135, § 1.

46-22-14.
Local regulation.

The provisions of this chapter, and of other applicable laws of this state, shall govern the operation, equipment, numbering, and all other matters relating thereto whenever any vessel shall be operated on the waters of this state, or when any activity regulated by this chapter shall take place thereon; but nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent the adoption of any ordinance or local law relating to operation and equipment of vessels, the provisions of which are identical to the provisions of this chapter, amendments thereto, or regulations issued thereunder; provided, that the ordinances or local laws shall be operative only so long as and to the extent that they continue to be identical to provisions of this chapter, amendments thereto, or regulations issued thereunder.

Any subdivision of this state may, at any time, but only after public notice, make formal application to the department of environmental management for special rules and regulations with reference to the operation of vessels on any waters within its territorial limits, and shall set forth therein the reasons which make those special rules or regulations necessary or appropriate.

The department of environmental management is hereby authorized to make special rules and regulations, not inconsistent with chapter 9 of this title or the rules and regulations issued thereunder, with reference to the operation of vessels not more than sixty-five feet (65´) in length on any waters within the territorial limits of any subdivision of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 134, § 2.

46-22-15.
Owner’s civil liability.

The owner of a vessel shall be liable for any injury or damage occasioned by the negligent operation of the vessel, whether the negligence consists of a violation of the provisions of the statutes of this state, or neglecting to observe such ordinary care and such operation as the rules of the common law require. The owner shall not be liable, however, unless the vessel is being used with his or her express or implied consent. It shall be presumed that the vessel is being operated with the knowledge and consent of the owner, if at the time of the injury or damage, it is under the control of his or her spouse, father, mother, brother, sister, son, daughter, or other immediate member of the owner’s family. Nothing contained herein shall be construed to relieve any other person from any liability which he or she would otherwise have, but nothing contained herein shall be construed to authorize or permit any recovery in excess of the injury or damage actually incurred.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 187, § 1.